Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1220
Revenue bonds; sale; terms.

Revenue bonds issued pursuant to section 14-1217 by a city of the metropolitan class may be sold in such manner as the city council may determine to be for the best interests of the city, taking into consideration the financial responsibility of the purchaser, the terms and conditions of the purchase, and the availability of the proceeds of the bonds when required for payment of the costs. Any such sale shall be at not less than ninety-two cents on the dollar and accrued interest.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 10, p. 620;

C.S.1929, § 14-1210;

Laws 1931, c. 27, § 2, p. 109;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1210;

R.S.1943, § 14-1220;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 23, p. 287;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 253.
July 21, 2022